Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.165.005

Purpose.

This chapter is designed to: (1) Promote the use of data when developing programs to assist students who are not meeting academic standards; and (2) guide school districts in providing the most effective and efficient practices when implementing supplemental instruction and services to assist students who are not meeting academic standards.

[ 2021 c 111 s 5; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 403; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 201; 2009 c 548 s 701; 2004 c 20 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 111: See notes following RCW 28A.300.139.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.